District of Columbia statutes.
47-412.01

Time for performance of acts when last day falls on Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

When the last day prescribed administered by the Office of Tax and Revenue for performing any act falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, the performance of the act shall be considered timely if it is performed on the next succeeding day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday. For the purposes of this section:

(1)

The last day for the performance of any act shall be determined by including any authorized extension of time.

(2)

The term “legal holiday” means a legal holiday in the District of Columbia.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-363, § 2(a)(2), 58 DCR 963

Applicability of D.C. Law 18-363: Section 3a of D.C. Law 18-363, as added by D.C. Law 19-155, § 4, provided:

“Sec. 3a. Applicability; transition.

“(a) Sections 2 and 3 shall apply upon Council approval and appointment by the Mayor of a full-time Chairperson and a full-time Vice Chairperson to the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall appoint the members of the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia with the advice and consent of the Council in accordance with the provisions of section 2(b)(3).”

For temporary (90 day) addition of § 3a of D.C. Law 18-363, see § 2 of Real Property Tax Appeals Commission Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-76, June 23, 2011, 58 DCR 5377).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 3a of D.C. Law 18-363, see § 2 of Real Property Tax Appeals Commission Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-33, March 15, 2011, 58 DCR 2608).
Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 19-75 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 6 of D.C. Law 19-75 repealed D.C. Law 19-9.
“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall appoint the members of the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia with the advice and consent of the Council in accordance with the provisions of section 2(b)(3).”.
“(a) Sections 2 and 3 shall apply upon Council approval and appointment by the Mayor of a full-time Chairperson and a full-time Vice Chairperson to the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia.
“Sec. 3a. Applicability; transition.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-75 added a section to D.C. Law 18-363 to read as follows:
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-9 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-9 added a section to D.C. Law 18-363 to read as follows: “Sec. 3a. Applicability. ”Sections 2 and 3 shall apply as of October 1, 2011.“.